nb: Instrumentbord tilbehør posisjon: Over infotainmentskjerm; Under infotainmentskjerm; Midten av dashbord; Dashbord på førerside; Deksel for instrumentpanel; På dashbord nær frontrute; På dashbordsøm/kant; Dashbord på passasjerside; Toppen av dashbord; Annet
ro-RO: Poziția accesoriului pe panoul de bord: Deasupra ecranului de infotainment; Sub ecranul de infotainment; Centrul bordului; Bord partea șoferului; Carcasă panou de instrumente; Pe bord lângă parbriz; Pe îmbinarea/marginea bordului; Bord partea pasagerului; Partea superioară a bordului; Altele
da: Tilbehørs placering på instrumentbrættet: Over infotainmentskærm; Under infotainmentskærm; Midt på instrumentbræt; Førerside af instrumentbræt; Instrumenthus; På instrumentbræt nær forrude; På instrumentbrættets søm/kant; Passagerside af instrumentbræt; Øverst på instrumentbræt; Andet
hr-HR: Položaj dodatne opreme na nadzornoj ploči: Iznad infotainment zaslona; Ispod infotainment zaslona; Sredina instrumentne ploče; Instrumentna ploča na vozačevoj strani; Pokrov skupa instrumenata; Na instrumentnoj ploči u blizini vjetrobranskog stakla; Na šavu/rubu instrumentne ploče; Instrumentna ploča na suvozačevoj strani; Vrh instrumentne ploče; Ostalo
es: Posición del accesorio en el panel de control: Sobre la pantalla de infoentretenimiento; Debajo de la pantalla de infoentretenimiento; Centro del tablero; Tablero del lado del conductor; Cubierta del cuadro de instrumentos; En el tablero cerca del parabrisas; En la costura/borde del tablero; Tablero del lado del pasajero; Parte superior del tablero; Otro
pt-BR: Posição do acessório do painel de controle: Acima da tela de infoentretenimento; Abaixo da tela de infoentretenimento; Centro do painel; Painel do lado do motorista; Cobertura do painel de instrumentos; No painel, perto do para-brisa; Na costura/borda do painel; Painel do lado do passageiro; Topo do painel; Outro
pt-PT: Posição do acessório do painel: Acima do ecrã de infoentretenimento; Abaixo do ecrã de infoentretenimento; Centro do tabliê; Lado do condutor do tabliê; Cobertura do painel de instrumentos; No tabliê perto do para-brisas; Na junção/extremidade do tabliê; Lado do passageiro do tabliê; Topo do tabliê; Outro
bg-BG: Позиция на аксесоара на арматурното табло: Над инфотейнмънт екрана; Под инфотейнмънт екрана; Централно табло; Табло от страна на шофьора; Козирка на арматурното табло; На таблото близо до предното стъкло; На ръба/шева на таблото; Табло от страна на пътника; Горна част на таблото; Други
sl-SI: Položaj dodatkov za nadzorno ploščo: Nad zaslonom za informacije in zabavo; Pod zaslonom za informacije in zabavo; Sredina armaturne plošče; Voznikova stran armaturne plošče; Pokrov instrumentne plošče; Na armaturni plošči blizu vetrobranskega stekla; Na robu armaturne plošče; Sovoznikova stran armaturne plošče; Vrh armaturne plošče; Drugo
ko: 대시보드 액세서리 위치: 인포테인먼트 화면 위; 인포테인먼트 화면 아래; 중앙 대시보드; 운전석 대시보드; 계기판 후드; 윈드실드 근처 대시보드 위; 대시보드 이음매/가장자리; 조수석 대시보드; 대시보드 상단; 기타
zh-TW: 儀表板配件位置: 資訊娛樂系統螢幕上方; 資訊娛樂系統螢幕下方; 儀表板中央; 駕駛座側儀表板; 儀表板遮光罩; 靠近擋風玻璃的儀表板上; 儀表板接縫/邊緣上; 副駕駛座側儀表板; 儀表板頂部; 其他
it: posizione accessori cruscotto: Sopra lo schermo del sistema di infotainment; Sotto lo schermo del sistema di infotainment; Al centro del cruscotto; Cruscotto lato conducente; Palpebra del quadro strumenti; Sul cruscotto vicino al parabrezza; Sulla cucitura/bordo del cruscotto; Cruscotto lato passeggero; Parte superiore del cruscotto; Altro
cs: Poloha příslušenství palubní desky: Nad obrazovkou infotainmentu; Pod obrazovkou infotainmentu; Střed palubní desky; Palubní deska na straně řidiče; Kaplička přístrojů; Na palubní desce u čelního skla; Na švu/okraji palubní desky; Palubní deska na straně spolujezdce; Vrch palubní desky; Jiné
sv: instrumentpanelens tillbehörsposition: Över infotainmentskärm; Under infotainmentskärm; Mitten av instrumentpanelen; Förarsidans instrumentpanel; Mätarhusets kåpa; På instrumentpanelen nära vindrutan; På instrumentpanelens söm/kant; Passagerarsidans instrumentpanel; Ovanpå instrumentpanelen; Övrigt
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งอุปกรณ์เสริมบนคอนโซลหน้า: เหนือหน้าจออินโฟเทนเมนต์; ใต้หน้าจออินโฟเทนเมนต์; กึ่งกลางคอนโซลหน้า; คอนโซลหน้าฝั่งคนขับ; กรอบครอบแผงหน้าปัด; บนคอนโซลใกล้กระจกหน้ารถ; บนตะเข็บ/ขอบคอนโซลหน้า; คอนโซลหน้าฝั่งผู้โดยสาร; ด้านบนคอนโซลหน้า; อื่นๆ
ru: Положение аксессуара на панели приборов: Над экраном мультимедийной системы; Под экраном мультимедийной системы; По центру приборной панели; Со стороны водителя; Козырек панели приборов; На приборной панели возле лобового стекла; На стыке/краю приборной панели; Со стороны пассажира; Верхняя часть приборной панели; Другое
fr: Emplacement de l’accessoire sur le tableau de bord: Au-dessus de l’écran d’infodivertissement; En dessous de l’écran d’infodivertissement; Centre du tableau de bord; Tableau de bord côté conducteur; Casquette du combiné d’instruments; Sur le tableau de bord, près du pare-brise; Sur le rebord/la couture du tableau de bord; Tableau de bord côté passager; Dessus du tableau de bord; Autre
fi: Kojelautalisävarusteen paikka: Tieto- ja viihdejärjestelmän näytön yläpuolella; Tieto- ja viihdejärjestelmän näytön alapuolella; Kojelaudan keskellä; Kojelaudan kuljettajan puolella; Mittariston suojus; Kojelaudassa tuulilasin lähellä; Kojelaudan saumassa/reunassa; Kojelaudan matkustajan puolella; Kojelaudan päällä; Muu
zh-CN: 控制面板配件位置: 信息娱乐屏幕上方; 信息娱乐屏幕下方; 仪表板中央; 驾驶员侧仪表板; 仪表盘护罩; 靠近挡风玻璃的仪表板上; 仪表板接缝/边缘上; 乘客侧仪表板; 仪表板顶部; 其他
el: Θέση αξεσουάρ στο ταμπλό: Πάνω από την οθόνη infotainment; Κάτω από την οθόνη infotainment; Κέντρο ταμπλό; Ταμπλό πλευράς οδηγού; Κάλυμμα πίνακα οργάνων; Στο ταμπλό κοντά στο παρμπρίζ; Στη ραφή/άκρη του ταμπλό; Ταμπλό πλευράς συνοδηγού; Επάνω μέρος ταμπλό; Άλλο
ja: ダッシュボードアクセサリーの位置: インフォテインメント画面上部; インフォテインメント画面下部; ダッシュボード中央; 運転席側ダッシュボード; インストルメントクラスターフード; ダッシュボード上のフロントガラス付近; ダッシュボードの継ぎ目/端; 助手席側ダッシュボード; ダッシュボード上部; その他
de: Position des Armaturenbrettzubehörs: Über dem Infotainment-Bildschirm; Unter dem Infotainment-Bildschirm; Mitte des Armaturenbretts; Armaturenbrett (Fahrerseite); Abdeckung des Kombiinstruments; Auf dem Armaturenbrett nahe der Windschutzscheibe; An Naht/Kante des Armaturenbretts; Armaturenbrett (Beifahrerseite); Oberseite des Armaturenbretts; Sonstige
sk-SK: Poloha príslušenstva panela: Nad obrazovkou informačno-zábavného systému; Pod obrazovkou informačno-zábavného systému; Stred palubnej dosky; Palubná doska na strane vodiča; Kryt prístrojového panela; Na palubnej doske pri čelnom skle; Na šve/okraji palubnej dosky; Palubná doska na strane spolujazdca; Vrch palubnej dosky; Iné
pl: Położenie akcesorium na desce rozdzielczej: Nad ekranem systemu informacyjno-rozrywkowego; Pod ekranem systemu informacyjno-rozrywkowego; Środek deski rozdzielczej; Deska rozdzielcza od strony kierowcy; Daszek zestawu wskaźników; Na desce rozdzielczej w pobliżu szyby; Na szwie/krawędzi deski rozdzielczej; Deska rozdzielcza od strony pasażera; Góra deski rozdzielczej; Inne
lt-LT: Prietaisų skydelio aksesuaro padėtis: Virš informacijos ir pramogų ekrano; Po informacijos ir pramogų ekranu; Prietaisų skydelio centre; Vairuotojo pusės prietaisų skydelyje; Prietaisų skydelio gaubtas; Prietaisų skydelyje prie priekinio stiklo; Ant prietaisų skydelio siūlės / krašto; Keleivio pusės prietaisų skydelyje; Prietaisų skydelio viršuje; Kita
en: Dashboard accessory position: Above infotainment screen; Below infotainment screen; Center dashboard; Driver-side dashboard; Instrument cluster hood; On dash near windshield; On dashboard seam/edge; Passenger-side dashboard; Top of dashboard; Other
hu: Műszerfaltartozék pozíciója: Infotainment képernyő fölött; Infotainment képernyő alatt; Középső műszerfal; Vezetőoldali műszerfal; Műszerfal-árnyékoló; Műszerfalon a szélvédő közelében; Műszerfal illesztésénél/szélénél; Utasoldali műszerfal; Műszerfal teteje; Egyéb
nl: Positie van het dashboardaccessoire: Boven infotainmentscherm; Onder infotainmentscherm; Midden dashboard; Dashboard bestuurderszijde; Instrumentenpaneelkap; Op dashboard bij voorruit; Op dashboardnaad/-rand; Dashboard passagierszijde; Bovenkant dashboard; Overige
vi: Vị trí phụ kiện táp-lô: Phía trên màn hình thông tin giải trí; Phía dưới màn hình thông tin giải trí; Táp lô trung tâm; Táp lô bên người lái; Mái che cụm đồng hồ; Trên táp lô gần kính chắn gió; Trên đường nối/mép táp lô; Táp lô bên hành khách; Mặt trên táp lô; Khác
tr: Torpido aksesuar konumu: Bilgi-eğlence ekranının üstünde; Bilgi-eğlence ekranının altında; Orta ön göğüs; Sürücü tarafı ön göğüs; Gösterge paneli siperliği; Ön camın yanında göğüs üstünde; Göğüs dikişi/kenarı üstünde; Yolcu tarafı ön göğüs; Ön göğsün üstü; Diğer